Hawaii, session 2026, SB1177.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  This Act shall be known and cited as the "Hawaii State Search and Rescue Coordinator Act". SECTION 2. The legislature finds that Hawaii's unique geographic conditions, including seven hundred fifty miles of coastline and 3,800,000 acres of undeveloped property, pose significant challenges for search and rescue operations.  Current search and rescue operations in Hawaii are fragmented, involving multiple agencies having varying standards and protocols, leading to inefficiencies and safety risks. The legislature further finds that Hawaii is among the states having the highest rates of missing persons, necessitating improved oversight and accountability for search and rescue activities.  Recent data highlights a lack of funding, tools, training, and technology for statewide search and rescue operations, contributing to delayed responses and compromised outcomes. The legislature recognizes that the establishment of an office of the state search and rescue coordinator would ensure a centralized authority for search and rescue operations; unified communication and collaboration among all participating federal, state, and county agencies and volunteer organizations; adequate training and resources to improve search and rescue outcomes and reduce costs; oversight of resource allocation and deployment; and enhanced public safety through streamlined processes. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to enhance public safety and improve the coordination, efficiency, and effectiveness of search and rescue operations throughout the State by establishing within the office of the state fire marshal the office of the state search and rescue coordinator.      SECTION 3. The Hawaii Revised Statutes is amended by adding a new chapter to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "Chapter Search and Rescue §   -1 Definitions.  As used in this chapter: "Coordinator" means the state search and rescue coordinator. "Emergency support function 9" means the search and rescue function according to the department of defense and Hawaii emergency management agency. "Office" means the office of the state search and rescue coordinator. "Participating agencies" means federal, state, county, and volunteer organizations focusing on search and rescue operations, as identified by the state search and rescue coordinator. "Search and rescue operations" means any coordinated effort to locate, assist, or recover individuals in distress or danger, including: (1)  Missing person searches; (2)  Wilderness rescue operations; (3)  Urban search and rescue; and (4)  Maritime and aeronautical rescue operations. "State search and rescue coordinator" means the individual appointed to oversee statewide search and rescue operations. "Unified command structure" means a framework wherein multiple agencies and organizations involved in search and rescue operations collaborate, sharing authority and decision‑making responsibilities. §   -2  Office of the state search and rescue coordinator; established.  (a) There is established within the office of the state fire marshal, pursuant to section 132-16.5, the office of the state search and rescue coordinator.  The office shall be headed by a state search and rescue coordinator, who shall be appointed by the state fire marshal, with the approval of the governor, to serve for a term of five years.  The appointment of the state search and rescue coordinator shall be made without regard to chapters 76 and 89 and shall not be subject to the advice and consent of the senate.  The coordinator may hire staff as necessary. (b) The office shall oversee all statewide search and rescue operations, including coordination among participating agencies. §   -3  State search and rescue coordinator; powers and duties.  The state search and rescue coordinator shall: (1)  Develop and maintain a statewide search and rescue plan, ensuring compliance with emergency support function 9; (2)  Serve as the primary point of contact for all statewide search and rescue operations; (3)  Coordinate search and rescue operations involving participating agencies; (4)  Oversee the training, certification, and readiness of search and rescue personnel statewide; (5)  Manage the allocation and deployment of resources for search and rescue operations, including mutual aid requests; (6)  Establish and implement interagency communication protocols to improve coordination and efficiency during search and rescue operations; (7)  Administer the search and rescue special fund, pursuant to this chapter, to support operations, training, and public education initiatives; (8)  Collect and maintain data on search and rescue incidents, outcomes, and expenditures within the State and make the data available to the public as permitted by law; (9)  Promote public awareness and education initiatives to reduce the need for search and rescue operations and improve public safety; (10)  Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 and propose updates to statewide search and rescue policies and procedures, subject to approval by the state fire marshal; (11)  Ensure that all search and rescue operations conducted within the State are executed in accordance with applicable federal, state, and county laws, regulations, rules, and ordinances; (12)  Submit an annual report to the legislature and governor no later than sixty days prior to the convening of each regular session, including: (A)  A summary of all search and rescue operations conducted during the reporting year, including: (i)  The number and types of incidents; (ii)  The agencies and organizations involved; (iii)  The outcomes of the operations; and (iv)  Any challenges encountered; (B)  An overview of training programs and certification activities, including participation rates and notable achievements; (C)  A detailed accounting of expenditures from the search and rescue special fund, including: (i)  Expenditures allocated to operations, training, equipment, and public education, respectively, and any other expenditures and their purpose; (ii)  Revenue sources and amounts received; (iii)  The remaining balance in the special fund; and (iv)  Any recommendations for changes to the special fund's structure or usage; (D)  Recommendations for legislative or policy changes to improve the effectiveness and efficiency of search and rescue operations; and (E)  Any additional information deemed relevant by the coordinator; (13)  Partner with applicable national organizations and federal agencies to establish and oversee uniform mandatory training and certification programs for all search and rescue personnel in the State, including: (A)  Wilderness and urban search and rescue techniques; (B)  Water-based rescue and recovery operations; (C)  Use of technology in search and rescue operations, including: (i)  Cell phone forensics; (ii)  Drone operations; and (iii)  Geographic information systems; (D)  Mass casualty and disaster response protocols; (E)  Search and rescue coordination under the incident command system; and (F)  Federal compliance standards for search and rescue operations; (14)  Conduct regular statewide training exercises to ensure operational readiness and interagency coordination; and (15)  Periodically review and update training programs to reflect advancements in search and rescue technology and methodologies. §   -3  Participation in training programs.  (a)  Pursuant to this chapter, all participating agencies shall ensure their designated personnel complete mandatory training and maintain active certifications. (b) Volunteer teams involved in search and rescue operations may participate in training programs offered by the office. §   -4 Participating agencies.  (a)  Under the direction of the coordinator, the following agencies shall participate in search and rescue operations pursuant to this chapter: (1)  The department of defense, including the Hawaii emergency management agency; (2)  The department of land and natural resources; (3)  The department of the attorney general, including the missing child center; (4)  The department of law enforcement; (5)  The fire department of each county; (6)  The police department of each county; and (7)  The emergency services department of each county; in coordination with: (A)  The United States Coast Guard; (B)  Civil Air Patrol; (C)  The Federal Emergency Management Agency; and (D)  Volunteer search and rescue teams. (b) Participating agencies shall: (1)  Designate a liaison officer to serve as the primary point of contact with the coordinator; (2)  Provide regular updates on search and rescue operations, related activities, resources, and capabilities; (3)  Participate in statewide search and rescue training and planning initiatives; and (4)  Comply with policies and protocols established by the coordinator. (c)  Volunteer teams shall be encouraged to participate in training and planning initiatives and operate under the coordinator's direction. §   -5  Search and rescue special fund.  (a)  There is established a search and rescue special fund within the treasury of the State into which shall be deposited: (1)  All appropriations made by the legislature to the fund; (2)  Federal grants designated for search and rescue operations and related activities; (3)  Private donations and charitable contributions; and (4)  Any other sources of revenue permitted by law. (b)  Expenditures from the search and rescue special fund shall be administered and approved by the state search and rescue coordinator pursuant to applicable state law for: (1)  Operational and administrative expenses of the office; (2)  Procurement of tools, equipment, and technology necessary for search and rescue operations and related activities; (3)  Development and implementation of training and certification programs; (4)  Support for interagency coordination and communication systems; and (5)  Public outreach and education efforts aimed at reducing the need for search and rescue operations. (c) The state search and rescue coordinator shall maintain transparent financial records of all special fund expenditures to be included in the annual report to the legislature and governor." SECTION 4. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment of the office of the state search and rescue coordinator pursuant to this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the office of the state fire marshal for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 to be deposited into the search and rescue special fund. SECTION 6.  There is appropriated out of the search and rescue special fund the sum of $ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 for expenses of the office of the state search and rescue coordinator, pursuant to this Act. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the office of the state search and rescue coordinator for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 7. If any provision of this Act, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the Act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this Act are severable. SECTION 8. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025; provided that the state search and rescue coordinator pursuant to section 2 shall be appointed no later than January 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________